Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2404
Affiliated licensee, defined.

Affiliated licensee shall mean an associate broker as defined in section 81-885.01 or a salesperson as defined in such section who is under the supervision of a designated broker.

Laws 1994, LB 883, § 4.